Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1071.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 84.94, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Local action. Each planning authority of a county or municipality receiving information pursuant to subdivision 3 deleted text begin shall consider the protection ofdeleted text end new text begin must protectnew text end identified and important aggregate resourcesnew text begin , and access to those resources,new text end in their land use decisionsnew text begin and must incorporate those protections in their comprehensive land use plans, zoning ordinances, and other land use controlsnew text end . Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 473.859, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Land use plan. (a) A land use plan must include the water management plan required by section 103B.235, and shall designate the existing and proposed location, intensity and extent of use of land and water, including lakes, wetlands, rivers, streams, natural drainage courses, and adjoining land areas that affect water natural resources, for agricultural, residential, commercial, industrial and other public and private purposes, or any combination of such purposes. (b) A land use plan must contain a protection element, as appropriate, for historic sites, the matters listed in the water management plan required by section 103B.235, and an element for protection and development of access to direct sunlight for solar energy systems. (c) A land use plan must also include a housing element containing standards, plans and programs for providing adequate housing opportunities to meet existing and projected local and regional housing needs, including but not limited to the use of official controls and land use planning to promote the availability of land for the development of low and moderate income housing. (d) A land use plan must also include new text begin an element for protecting and developing access to aggregate resources and new text end the local government's goals, intentions, and priorities concerning deleted text begin aggregate anddeleted text end other natural resources, transportation infrastructure, land use compatibility, habitat, agricultural preservation, and other planning priorities, considering information regarding supply from the Minnesota Geological Survey Information Circular No. 46. (e) A land use plan must also include an inventory and projections pertaining to greenhouse gas emissions and vehicle miles traveled that are generated from activity that occurs within the local government's jurisdiction. The inventory and projections must include the emission sources from transportation, land use, energy use, solid waste, and, where available and applicable, livestock and agriculture. The inventory and projections must include the estimated impact of strategies, including efficient land use and compact growth, that reduce or naturally sequester greenhouse gas emissions across sectors. Sec. 3. new text begin RECOMMENDATIONS FOR LOCAL GOVERNMENT PERMITTING CHANGES TO PROTECT AGGREGATE RESOURCES.new text end new text begin By February 1, 2026, the commissioner of natural resources must make recommendations to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with primary jurisdiction over environment and local government for statutory changes that would facilitate local government permitting processes that adequately protect the state's aggregate resources and foster environmentally responsible reclamation of former aggregate mining sites. In developing the recommendations, the commissioner must work with interested stakeholders. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin APPROPRIATION; AGGREGATE MAPPING.new text end new text begin (a) $950,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $950,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of natural resources to: new text end new text begin (1) map the aggregate resource potential of additional counties outside the metropolitan area, as defined in Minnesota Statutes, section 473.121, and make the information available in print and electronic format to local units of government for use in planning and zoning; new text end new text begin (2) update the department's A Handbook for Reclaiming Sand and Gravel Pits in Minnesota; and new text end new text begin (3) provide technical assistance as needed to local units of government in making sound land-use decisions that preserve the availability of aggregate resources. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner of natural resources, in consultation with the Minnesota Geological Survey and the commissioners of transportation and employment and economic development, must examine whether a regional approach to aggregate mapping could yield financial or time efficiencies. If the commissioner determines that a regional approach would yield efficiencies, the commissioner must complete aggregate mapping for counties that have already requested aggregate mapping and then must implement a regional approach to mapping the remaining counties, notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 84.94. new text end new text begin (c) The base amount for this appropriation in fiscal year 2035 and thereafter is $0. new text end Sec. 5. new text begin APPROPRIATION; AGGREGATE RESOURCE INVENTORY.new text end new text begin $250,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of natural resources for the aggregate resource mapping program to update Information Circular 46, Aggregate Resources Inventory of the Seven-County Metropolitan Area, Minnesota (Minnesota Geological Survey 2000), with particular emphasis on projected needs and the estimated time until the aggregate resource is exhausted, and to perform duties under Minnesota Statutes, section 84.94. new text end